Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-4,100
Repealed. Laws 2018, LB377, § 87. Operative date January 1, 2019. Terms, defined.

For purposes of statutes governing schools:

(1) Affiliated school system means the high school district and the Class I districts or portions of Class I districts affiliated with such high school district;

(2) Affiliation or affiliation of school districts means an ongoing association of a Class I district or portion thereof not a part of a Class VI district with one or more existing Class II, III, IV, or V districts for the purpose of (a) providing a high school program serving the Class I district students and (b) maintaining tax support to finance such program. The services provided may include student transportation; and

(3) Class VI school system means a Class VI school district and each Class I school district or portion thereof which is part of the Class VI district.

Laws 1990, LB 259, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 511, § 8;

Laws 1992, LB 245, § 13;

Laws 1992, LB 1001, § 11;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 839, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 858, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1310, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-101.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 249.

An accepted affiliation petition is not a contract; rather, it creates a new school system. State ex rel. Fick v. Miller, 255 Neb. 387, 584 N.W.2d 809 (1998).